Louisiana, session 2026, SB498.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:824(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§824. Commitment of persons to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
* * *
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any
individual subject to confinement in a state adult penal or correctional
institution that is confined to a parish jail or institution, the department shall
provide all clothing and healthcare products that the individual would
otherwise receive at a state adult penal or correctional institution.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1107 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 498